Utah statutes.
16-16-809.   Vacancy on board.

(1)  Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a vacancy on the board of directors shall be filled:

(a)  within a reasonable time by majority vote of the remaining directors until the next annual members meeting or a special meeting of members called to fill the vacancy; and

(b)  for the unexpired term by members at the next annual members meeting or a special meeting of members called to fill the vacancy.

(2)  Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, if a vacating director was elected or appointed by a class of members or a district:

(a)  the new director shall be of that class or district; and

(b)  the selection of the director for the unexpired term shall be conducted in the same manner as would the selection for that position without a vacancy.

(3)  If a member appointed a vacating director, the organic rules may provide for that member to appoint a director to fill the vacancy.



Amended by Chapter 378, 2010 General Session

